Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2939YC (1) 91 ll/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 384.24, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . y. The acquisition, construction, 3 reconstruction, expansion, improvement, and repair of conduit 4 and the acquisition of real estate interests needed for such 5 purposes. 6